Utah statutes.
26-15-8.   Periodic evaluation of local health sanitation programs --
Minimum statewide enforcement standards -- Technical assistance.
(1)  The department shall periodically evaluate the sanitation programs of
local health departments to determine the levels of sanitation being
maintained throughout the state.
(2) (a)  The department shall ensure that each local health department's
enforcement of the minimum rules of sanitation adopted under Section 26-15-2
for restaurants and other places where food or drink is handled meets or
exceeds minimum statewide enforcement standards established by the department
by administrative rule.
(b)  Administrative rules adopted under Subsection (2)(a) shall include at
least:
(i)  the minimum number of periodic on-site inspections that must be conducted
by each local health department;
(ii)  criteria for conducting additional inspections; and
(iii)  standardized methods to be used by local health departments to assess
compliance with the minimum rules of sanitation adopted under Section 26-15-2.
(c)  The department shall help local health departments comply with the
minimum statewide enforcement standards adopted under this Subsection (2) by
providing technical assistance.
